test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensminaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwensmiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensmiwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: dakwenyminwiba
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: dakwensminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndakwenyminaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwenyminaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwenyminaanig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndakwensminaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwensminaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwensminaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdakwenyminaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwenyminaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwenyminaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdakwenymiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwenymiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwenymiwaag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdakwensminaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwensminaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwensminaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdakwensmiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwensmiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwensmiwaag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: dakwenymiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: dakwenymiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+4: dakwenyminwan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: dakwenyminiing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: dakwensmiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: dakwensmiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+4: dakwensminwan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: dakwensminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndakwenymibniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndakwenymibniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndakwenymibniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndakwensmibniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndakwensmibniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndakwensmibniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdakwenymibniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdakwenymibniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdakwenymibniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdakwensmibniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdakwensmibniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdakwensmibniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwenymibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwenymibniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwensmibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwensmibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwenymibniin
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwenymibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: dakwenymibniig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwensmibniin
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwensmibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: dakwensmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwenyshinaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwenyshinaandig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwensshinaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwensshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwenyshinaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenyshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwenyshiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenyshiwaadig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwensshinaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwensshiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensshiwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwenyshinwiba
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwensshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwenyshinaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwenyshinaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwenyshinaanig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwensshinaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwensshinaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwensshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwenyshinaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwenyshinaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwenyshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwenyshiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwenyshiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwenyshiwaag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwensshinaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwensshinaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwensshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwensshiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwensshiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwensshiwaag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwenyshiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwenyshiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+4: dakwenyshinwan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwenyshiniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwensshiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwensshiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: dakwensshinwan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwensshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwenyshibniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwenyshibniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwenyshibniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwensshibniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwensshibniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwensshibniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwenyshibniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwenyshibniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwenyshibniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwensshibniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwensshibniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwensshibniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: dakwenyshibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwenyshibniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: dakwensshibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwensshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: dakwenyshibniin
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwenyshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwenyshibniig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: dakwensshibniin
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwensshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwensshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwenynaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwenynaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwenynaanbaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwensnaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwensnaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwensnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenynaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenynaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenynaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenywaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenywaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenywaabniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensnaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensnaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenswaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenswaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenswaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwenywaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwenywaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: dakwenyniwbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwenyniwbaniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwenswaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwenswaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: dakwensniwbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwensniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwemshinaanba
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwemshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwemshinaanba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwemshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwemshiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwemshiwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwemshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwemshinaanin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwemshinaaning
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwemshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwemshinaanin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwemshinaaning
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwemshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwemshiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwemshiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwemshiwaag
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwemshiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwemshiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: dakwemshinwan
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwemshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwemshibniin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwemshibniing
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwemshibniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwemshibniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwemshibniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwemshibniig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwemshibniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwemshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwemshibniin
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwemshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwemshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwemnaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwemnaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwemnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwemnaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwemnaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwemnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwemwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwemwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwemwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwemwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwemwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: dakwemniwbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwemniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwewshinaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwewshinaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwewshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwewshinaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwewshinaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwewshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwewshiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwewshiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwewshiwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwewshiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwewshiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwewshinwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwewshinwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwenymishnaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwenymishnaandig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwensmishnaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwensmishnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwenymishnaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenymishnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwenymishwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenymishwaadig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwensmishnaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensmishnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwensmishwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensmishwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwenymishniwba
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwensmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwenymishnaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwenymishnaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwenymishnaanig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwensmishnaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwensmishnaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwensmishnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwenymishnaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwenymishnaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwenymishnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwenymishwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwenymishwaang
